Massachusetts, session 194th, H1769.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 70A of chapter 221 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2012 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “to which they have been 
assigned” in lines 3-4 the following words:- “or on the grounds adjacent to the court, including 
court parking areas,”  
SECTION 2. Section 70A of chapter 221 is hereby further amended by adding the 
following sentence in line 6: - “Said court officers and those authorized to act as court officers 
shall also have police powers when attending a court proceeding convened in a location other 
than a court house, when escorting jurors on court business, when escorting a judicial officer, or 
when participating in the care, custody or transport of detainees.”